Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1205
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; Attorney General; coordination.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall coordinate with the Attorney General to carry out the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 5.